Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1003.   School district participation in UPSTART.

(1)  A school district may participate in UPSTART if the local school board agrees to work in cooperation with the contractor to provide administrative and technical support for the pilot project.

(2)  Family participants in UPSTART shall be solicited from school districts that participate in UPSTART.

(3)  A school district that participates in UPSTART shall:

(a)  receive funding for:

(i)  paraprofessional and technical support staff; and

(ii)  travel, materials, and meeting costs of the program;

(b)  participate in program training by the contractor; and

(c)  agree to adopt standardized policies and procedures in implementing the pilot project.



Enacted by Chapter 397, 2008 General Session

